Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1132.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1422.4. Unhealthy Ultra-Processed Food Prohibited in Competitive Foods.--(a) A public school may not sell or offer a competitive food on school grounds during the school day if the competitive food contains an unhealthy ultra-processed food.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless 123456789101112131415161718 the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Competitive food" means a food offered or sold in competition with reimbursable meals served under the National School Lunch or School Breakfast Program . "School day" has the same meaning as provided in section 1326."Ultra-processed food" means a food that contains one or more of the following:(1) A substance not available in the Food and Drug Administration Substances Added to Food database, but having any of the following:(i) Surface-active agents, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(29) (relating to definitions) as of the effecitve date of this section.(ii) Stabilizers and thickeners, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(28) as of the effective date of this section.(iii) Propellants, aerating agents and gases, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(25) as of the effective date of this section.(iv) Colors and coloring adjuncts, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(4) as of the effective date of this section.(v) Emulsifiers and emulsifier salts, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(8) as of the effective date of this section.(vi) Flavoring agents and adjuvants, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(12), excluding spices and other natural seasonings and flavorings as listed in 21 CFR 182.10 (relating to spices and other natural seasonings and flavorings) as of the effective date of this section.(vii) Flavor enhancers, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(11) as of the effective date of this section, excluding spices and other natural seasonings and flavorings as listed in 21 CFR 20250HB1132PN1417 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 182.10 as of the effective date of this section.(viii) Surface-finishing agents, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(30) as of the effective date of this section.(ix) Non-nutritive sweeteners, as defined in 21 CFR 170.3(o)(19) as of the effective date of this section.(2) A substance available in the Food and Drug Administration Substances Added to Food database that are designated as having any of the technical effects listed in paragraph (1), excluding spices and other natural seasonings and flavorings, as listed in 21 CFR 182.10 as of the effective date of this section."Unhealthy ultra-processed food" means an ultra-processed food that does not comply with the requirements under 21 CFR 101.65(d) (relating to implied nutrient content claims and related label statements) , as of the effective date of this section, for use of the term "healthy" as an implied nutrient content claim on the label or in labeling of a food.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2027.20250HB1132PN1417 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718